Hawaii statutes.
§632-2 Appeals. Declaratory judgments
may be reviewed as other judgments. [L 1921, c 162, §2; RL 1925, §2919; RL
1935, §4221; RL 1945, §9972; RL 1955, §228-2; HRS §632-2; am L 1972, c 89,
§1(d)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next